Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB29.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definition of "diverse and disadvantaged businesses" in section 2201 of Title 62 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended and the section is amended by adding definitions to read:§ 2201. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Contract-specific goal." A goal established under section 2203 (relating to HUB Zone Business Procurement Program) for use of HUB zone businesses on a specific procurement."Diverse and disadvantaged businesses." A woman-owned 12345678910111213141516171819 business, a minority-owned business [or], a veteran-owned business or a HUB zone business."Good faith efforts." The practices or activities instituted by a bidder or offeror to promote and ensure participation by HUB zone businesses in a procurement in order to meet a contract-specific goal."HUB zone." A historically underutilized business zone in this Commonwealth."HUB zone business." A for-profit business located in a HUB zone that satisfies the qualification criteria specified at 13 CFR Pt. 126 Subpt. B (relating to requirements to be a certified HUBZone small business concern)."HUB Zone Program." The HUB Zone Business Procurement Program established under section 2203(a).* * *"Utilization schedule." A document, submitted by a bidder or offeror as part of a bid or proposal, in which a bidder or offeror outlines HUB zone business participation for a contract and identifies the dollar value or percentages of the work to be performed.* * *Section 2. Section 2202 heading and (c) of Title 62 are amended to read:§ 2202. [Woman-owned business, minority-owned business or veteran-owned business] Diverse and disadvantaged businesses.* * *(c) Lists.--The department shall compile, maintain and make available source lists of businesses verified by the department as a diverse or disadvantaged business for the purpose of 20250HB0029PN0010 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 encouraging procurement from those businesses and for the purpose of complying with section 2203 (relating to HUB Zone Business Procurement Program).* * *Section 3. Title 62 is amended by adding a section to read:§ 2203. HUB Zone Business Procurement Program.(a) Establishment.--The HUB Zone Business Procurement Program is established within the department for the purpose of ensuring that executive agencies and independent agencies for which the department acts as purchasing agency enter into contracts with HUB zone businesses as provided under this section. The department shall administer the HUB Zone Program, including:(1) Formulating, proposing and implementing policy and regulations for the development, implementation and monitoring of the HUB Zone Program.(2) Providing information and assistance to HUB zone businesses relating to the HUB Zone Program, including special training programs for HUB zone businesses to learn how to do business with executive agencies and independent agencies for which the department acts as purchasing agency and serving as a liaison to communities, contractors, professional and supplier groups, associations and organizations.(3) Ensuring that HUB zone businesses are solicited on procurements for which the HUB zone businesses may be suited.(4) Establishing contract-specific goals, in collaboration with the purchasing agency, based upon relevant factors, including the availability of HUB zone businesses to meet the scope of work of the procurement.20250HB0029PN0010 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (5) In collaboration with the purchasing agency, reviewing utilization schedules, considering requests for waivers of contract-specific goals based upon a showing of good faith efforts and evaluating the extent to which contract-specific goals were achieved.(6) Monitoring contracts to evaluate compliance with contract-specific goals and commitments.(7) Receiving, reviewing and acting upon complaints and suggestions concerning the HUB Zone Program.(8) Evaluating the effectiveness and utility of the HUB Zone Program.(b) HUB zone business procurement.--(1) Within six months of the effective date of this section, an executive agency and independent agency for which the department acts as purchasing agency shall establish contract-specific goals that ensure that a contract entered into by the purchasing agency garners:(i) not less than 20% participation from HUB zone businesses on contracts totaling at least $100,000 and not more than $750,000; or(ii) not less than 25% participation from HUB zone businesses on contracts totaling more than $750,000.(2) Paragraph (1) shall not apply to a contract:(i) where no qualified HUB zone business exists; or(ii) that has received a waiver under subsection (c).(3) To satisfy requirements under paragraph (1), a purchasing agency may award contracts directly to prime HUB zone business contractors or indirectly to HUB zone business subcontractors.20250HB0029PN0010 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (c) Request for a full or partial waiver and good faith efforts.--(1) Bidders or offerors may request a partial or full waiver of a contract-specific goal for HUB zone business participation. A bidder or offeror requesting a partial or full waiver shall submit, in writing, a report detailing efforts to meet the contract-specific goal as required by the solicitation.(2) In reviewing a bidder's or offeror's written request for a partial or full waiver of a contract-specific goal, the purchasing agency, based on the recommendation of the department, shall determine if a bidder or offeror has made good faith efforts to meet the contract-specific goal and to what extent the waiver request should be granted. In determining if a bidder or offeror has made good faith efforts, the purchasing agency and the department may consider levels of participation by HUB zone businesses by other bidders or offerors.(d) Compliance.--The department shall perform compliance reviews and monitor contracts with HUB zone businesses on a monthly basis.(e) Payment verification reports.--A purchasing agency shall submit payment verification reports to the department to assist with monitoring compliance and to determine if the prime contractor met the prime contractor's overall contract-specific goal and any subgoals that were established for the contract.Section 4. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0029PN0010 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627